District of Columbia statutes.
2-1212.21

Establishment of a grocery store development program.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish a Grocery Store Development Program (“Program”) within the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development to attract grocery stores to, and renovate grocery stores in, eligible areas in the District and to create quality jobs for District residents.

(b)

The District of Columbia Housing Authority and the Office of Planning shall, as requested by the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development, assist the program by providing technical assistance and other resources. The Washington, D.C. Economic Partnership may assist this program by providing technical assistance and support.

(c)

The Program may:

(1)

Establish a working group of community development financial institutions, District agencies, nonprofit organizations, and other interested District individuals and organizations to seek federal funding through the Healthy Food Financing Initiative, the new market tax credits program, pursuant to section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, approved December 21, 2000 (114 Stat. 2763; 26 U.S.C. § 45D), and other programs; and

(2)

(A)

Provide a combination of any or all of the following to grocery stores in eligible areas:

(i)

Grants;

(ii)

Loans;

(iii)

Federal tax credits;

(iv)

Other financial assistance; and

(v)

Technical assistance.

(B)

The benefits provided by this paragraph shall be awarded to grocery stores in eligible areas on a competitive basis, with priority given to grocery stores in eligible areas that are underserved by retail sales of healthy food.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-353, § 201, 58 DCR 746

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) prohibition of a restrictive covenant concerning grocery stores, see § 2 of the Grocery Store Restrictive Covenant Prohibition Temporary Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-171, March 7, 2015, 61 DCR 12448).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) prohibition of a restrictive covenant concerning grocery stores, see § 2 of the Grocery Store Restrictive Covenant Prohibition Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-457, Oct. 23, 2014, 61 DCR 11366, 20 STAT 4362).
For temporary (90 days) prohibition of a restrictive covenant concerning grocery stores, see § 2 of the Grocery Store Restrictive Covenant Prohibition Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-1, Feb. 19, 2015, 62 DCR 2464, 21 DCSTAT 797).
For temporary (90 days) prohibition of a restrictive covenant concerning grocery stores, see § 2 of the Grocery Store Restrictive Covenant Prohibition Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-177, Oct. 22, 2015, 62 DCR 13988).